Utah statutes.
53-7-213.   Criminal charges resulting from investigation -- Procedure.
If the state fire marshal, his deputy, or representative, or any other officer
participating in the investigation of any fire  believes that there is
evidence sufficient to charge a person with arson, burning with intent to
defraud or prejudice the insurer, or a similar crime, he shall furnish the
county attorney or district attorney of the county in which the crime occurred
with his evidence and request the county attorney or district attorney to
commence the proper procedures to charge the person with the appropriate
crime.
